Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.190

Penalty for failure to execute process or false return.

If any officer, without showing good cause therefor, fail to execute any process to him or her delivered, and make due return thereof, or make a false return, such officer, for every such offense, shall pay to the party injured ten dollars, and all damage such party may have sustained by reason thereof, to be recovered in a civil action.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3013; Code 1881 s 1752; 1873 p 343 s 51; 1854 p 230 s 39; RRS s 1776.]